Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5320.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-21 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance —
Prescription Drugs" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-21-4. Prohibition of prior authorization or step therapy protocol.
(a) The Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined by this chapter, and any
contract between the Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined under chapter 8 of title
40, and a managed care organization shall not require prior authorization or a step therapy protocol
for the prescription of a nonpreferred medication classified as an anticonvulsant or antipsychotic
on their drug formulary.
(b) If the secretary of health and human services determines that authorization from a
federal agency is necessary for the implementation of this section, the executive office of health
and human services is authorized to seek such state plan amendment and may delay implementing
the provisions until the authorization is granted.
(c) The Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined under chapter 8 of title 40,
shall require, through amending current and future medical assistance managed care contracts, that
the managed care organizations meet the provisions of this section.
(d) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not affect clinical prior authorization
edits to prescriptions of medications classified as an anticonvulsant or antipsychotic.
(e) This section does not prevent the Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined

under chapter 8 of title 40, and any contract between the Rhode Island medical assistance program
and a managed care organization from denying an exception for a medication that has been removed
from the market due to safety concerns from the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(f) For the purposes of this section, "step therapy protocol" means a protocol that
establishes a specific sequence in which prescription medications for a specified medical condition
are medically necessary for a particular enrollee and are covered under a pharmacy or medical
benefit by a carrier, including self-administered and physician-administered drugs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and applies to all healthcare policies,
contracts, plans, and certificates executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued or renewed in
this state on or after January 1, 2026.
========
LC000814
========
LC000814 - Page 2 of 3